Arkansas, session 2025, HB1610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Emergency medical situations can present a danger to the
life of pregnant women and unborn children if proper care and treatment is
not rendered;
(2)(A) In a tragic case where pregnancy poses a serious danger
to a pregnant woman’s life, the General Assembly has prescribed an objective
standard, requiring a doctor to exercise “reasonable medical judgment” before
ending the pregnancy.
(B) The reasonable medical judgment standard is the
longstanding norm and applies in all medical contexts;
(3)(A) The reasonable medical judgment standard has never been
*JMB180*
03-05-2025 10:49:58 JMB180

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1610
found unworkable or vague in any medical context, including abortion.
(B) Under Karlin v. Foust, 188 F.3d 446, 464 (7th Cir.
1999), the reasonable medical judgement standard “is the same standard by
which all ... medical decisions are judged under traditional theories of tort
law”; and
(4) The addition of guidance and clarifications in state law
ensures that physicians and medical facilities will continue to administer
appropriate emergency medical treatment to save the lives of pregnant women
in medical emergencies.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide guidance and
clarification regarding abortion laws and appropriate emergency medical
procedures to save the lives of pregnant women.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-61-303 is amended to read as follows:
5-61-303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using, prescribing,
administering, procuring, or selling of any instrument, medicine, drug, or
any other substance, device, or means with the purpose to terminate the
pregnancy of a woman, with knowledge that the termination by any of those
means will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the purpose to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by
spontaneous abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Fertilization” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon
with a human ovum;
(3)(A) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which, in
reasonable medical judgment, complicates the medical condition of a pregnant
woman to such an extent that termination of a pregnancy an abortion is
necessary to preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life is endangered
by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a
life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy
03-05-2025 10:49:58 JMB180

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1610
itself.; and
(B) "Medical emergency" does not include:
(i) Conditions for which treatment is available that
can, in reasonable medical judgement, be expected to preserve or sustain the
life of the pregnant woman without ending the pregnancy;
(ii) A psychological or emotional condition; or
(iii) A medical diagnosis that is based on a claim
made by the pregnant woman or based on a presumption that the pregnant woman
will engage in conduct that could result in her death or that could cause
substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function
of the pregnant woman;
(4) “Reasonable medical judgment” means a medical judgment that
would be made or medical action that would be undertaken by a reasonably
prudent, qualified physician, knowledgeable about the case and the treatment
possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved; and
(4)(5) “Unborn child” means an individual organism of the
species Homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-61-304(d), concerning the prohibition
within the Arkansas Human Life Protection Act, is amended to read as follows:
(d) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution not a violation under
this section if a licensed physician provides medical treatment to a pregnant
woman which results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death to the
unborn child.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-61-403 is amended to read as follows:
5-61-403. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Abortion” means the act of using, prescribing,
administering, procuring, or selling of any instrument, medicine, drug, or
any other substance, device, or means with the purpose to terminate the
pregnancy of a woman, with knowledge that the termination by any of those
means will with reasonable likelihood cause the death of the unborn child.
(B) An act under subdivision (1)(A) of this section is not
an abortion if the act is performed with the purpose to:
(i) Save the life or preserve the health of the
03-05-2025 10:49:58 JMB180

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1610
unborn child;
(ii) Remove a dead unborn child caused by
spontaneous abortion; or
(iii) Remove an ectopic pregnancy;
(2) “Fertilization” means the fusion of a human spermatozoon
with a human ovum;
(3)(A) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which, in
reasonable medical judgment, complicates the medical condition of a pregnant
woman to such an extent that termination of a pregnancy an abortion is
necessary to preserve the life of a pregnant woman whose life is endangered
by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a
life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy
itself.; and
(B) "Medical emergency" does not include:
(i) Conditions for which treatment is available that
can, in reasonable medical judgement, be expected to preserve or sustain the
life of the pregnant woman without ending the pregnancy;
(ii) A psychological or emotional condition; or
(iii) A medical diagnosis that is based on a claim
made by the pregnant woman or based on a presumption that the pregnant woman
will engage in conduct that could result in her death or that could cause
substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function
of the pregnant woman;
(4) “Reasonable medical judgment” means a medical judgment that
would be made or medical action that would be undertaken by a reasonably
prudent, qualified physician, knowledgeable about the case and the treatment
possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved; and
(4)(5) “Unborn child” means an individual organism of the
species Homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-61-404(d), concerning the prohibition
within the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(d) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution not a violation under
this section if a licensed physician provides medical treatment to a pregnant
woman which results in the accidental or unintentional physical injury or
03-05-2025 10:49:58 JMB180

As Engrossed: H3/5/25 HB1610
death to the unborn child.

/s/Lundstrum

































03-05-2025 10:49:58 JMB180